lezg.twol
Alphabet
  а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у уь ф х ц ч I ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
  %<essive%> %<essive%>:0 %<elative%> %<directive%> %<erg%> %<erg%>:0 
  а:0 и:0
;

Rules

"drop <essive> before <elative>"
%<essive%>:0 <=> _ %<elative%> ;

"drop <essive> before <directive>"
%<essive%>:0 <=> _ %directive%> ;

"drop <erg> before any other affix (oblique form)"
%<erg%>:0 <=> _ ( %<elative%> | %<directive%> | %<gen%> | %<dat%> | %<ad%> | %<post%> | %<sub%> | %<in%> | %<super%> ) ; 
